Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-3809
Corporation; contract; limitations.

A prepaid dental service corporation shall not contract itself to practice dentistry in any manner, nor shall the corporation control or attempt to control the dentist in the exercise of professional judgment.

Laws 1982, LB 139, § 9.